North Dakota statutes. TITLE 20.1 Game, Fish, Predators, and Boating
CHAPTER 20.1-14 Falconry

20.1-14-01.
General penalty.

Any person violating a provision of this chapter for which a penalty is not specifically provided is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 213, § 1.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class B misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

20.1-14-02.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Falconry” means the sport of taking quarry by the use of trained raptors.

“Raptor” means any migratory bird of the family accipitridae, excluding bald and golden eagles, falconidae, or strigidae.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 213, § 1.

20.1-14-03.
Departmental authority.

The department shall make such rules governing the issuance and use of falconry licenses and prescribe the fee for the licenses as it deems proper and necessary and in compliance with federal regulations. The department may revoke any falconry license and seize the raptors held pursuant thereto if the licensee:

Fails to provide proper care for the raptors in the licensee’s possession.

Allows raptors in the licensee’s possession to become a public nuisance.

Violates any of the provisions of this chapter or any rules made pursuant thereto.

Fails to comply with any statute, rule, or regulation applicable to the hunting of the game taken or to be taken.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 213, § 1.